Louisiana, session 2026, SB132.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:416.16.1(A)(1), (2), and (4), and (E) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 17:416.16.1(F) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§416.16.1. School mapping data; exterior master key box
A.(1) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education and the state
Department of Education shall coordinate with the Louisiana Center for Safe Schools
to provide the mapping data of all public schools in order to provide law enforcement
officials and other first responders with the appropriate tools needed for school
safety.
(2) Upon preparing a school crisis management and response plan in
accordance with R.S. 17:416.16 each city, parish, or other local public school system
governing authority or a vendor shall submit a copy of the most recent blueprints and
school mapping data of each school building and facility in the school system and
the method by which law enforcement officers and other first responders can
obtain access to locked facilities, including all external and internal locks, or the
location of the exterior master key box, to each local law enforcement agency with
jurisdiction over any portion of the school governing authority, each local and state
public safety and emergency preparedness office, the Louisiana Center for Safe
Schools, and to the school's office for use in response to emergencies.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 132 ENROLLED
(4) For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(a) "Exterior master key box" means a secure, wall-mounted, anti-theft
resistant container that is installed outside a school's building to provide first
responders with immediate access to the school during a school crisis to allow
for rapid response and rescue.
(a)(b) "First responders" means local, state, and federal law enforcement
agencies, fire, public safety, and emergency preparedness officials.
(b)(c) "School mapping data" means information provided in an electronic
or digital format to assist first responders in responding to emergencies at public
schools.
* * *
E. Each public school governing authority that has not, prior to January
1, 2028, instituted a system for allowing access to locked facilities to law
enforcement officials and other first responders shall from funds appropriated
by the legislature to the Louisiana Center for Safe Schools, install at least one
exterior master key box on the campus of each public school under its
jurisdiction.
(1) Each exterior master key box is to be installed at a location on the
school's campus to permit first responders to gain expedited access to the school
building.
(2) The precise location of the exterior master key box shall be
determined by the public school governing authority in collaboration with local
law enforcement agencies for the jurisdiction in which the school building is
located.
(3) The exterior master key box shall contain all of the following:
(a) Copies of building keys or key cards to obtain entry to all doors on
the school campus.
(b) Printed maps with school mapping data that is required by this
Section.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 132 ENROLLED
(4) Each master key box installed at a school shall meet the basic
commercial applications standard for anti-theft alarms and devices as
prescribed under Underwriters Laboratories Standard 1037.
E.F. Blueprints and school mapping data of a public school building or
facility shall not be subject to the Public Records Law.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.